Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-105
Notarial acts prohibited; when.

(1) A notary public shall not perform any notarial act as authorized by Chapter 64, articles 1, 2, and 3 if the principal:

(a) Is not in the presence of the notary public at the time of the notarial act; and

(b) Is not personally known to the notary public or identified by the notary public through satisfactory evidence.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Identified by the notary public through satisfactory evidence means identification of an individual based on:

(i) At least one document issued by a government agency that is current and that bears the photographic image of the individual's face and signature and a physical description of the individual, except that a properly stamped passport without a physical description is satisfactory evidence; or

(ii) The oath or affirmation of one credible witness unaffected by the document or transaction to be notarized who is personally known to the notary public and who personally knows the individual, or the oaths or affirmations of two credible witnesses unaffected by the document or transaction to be notarized who each personally knows the individual and shows to the notary public documentary identification as described in subdivision (a)(i) of this subsection; and

(b) Personal knowledge of identity or personally known means familiarity with an individual resulting from interactions with that individual over a period of time sufficient to dispel any reasonable uncertainty that the individual has the identity claimed.

(3) This section does not apply to online notarial acts under the Online Notary Public Act.

Laws 2004, LB 315, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB186, § 20.

Online Notary Public Act, see section 64-401.